Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 56.041 is amended to read:
56.041. (1) The Operating Account is established in the General Fund of the State Treasury.
(2) The net amount accruing to the  Secretary of State from all fees, charges, interest, fines,
penalties and miscellaneous revenues from  all sources relating to business registry functions, and
moneys received by the Secretary of State under ORS chapters  79 and 194 and ORS 80.100 to 80.130,
87.246, 87.767 and 87.806  to 87.831 shall, after deduction of refunds, be paid over to the State
Treasurer and deposited at least monthly in the Operating Account.
(3) Moneys deposited to the credit of the Operating  Account are continuously appropriated to
the Secretary of State for the expenses of carrying out the functions and duties of the Secretary of
State relating to business registry, and the functions and duties of  the Secretary of State under ORS
chapters 79 and 194 and ORS 56.200 to 56.209, 80.100 to 80.130, 87.246, 87.767 and 87.806 to 87.831.
(4) At  the end of each month, the Secretary of State shall determine the number of business
registry filings during the month for which the Secretary of  State collected the fees described in
ORS 56.140 (1) to (4). [ An amount equal to  $20 for each of those filings shall be deposited by the
Secretary of State in the Operating Account. ] After  deducting and depositing to the Operating
Account the expenses of carrying out the functions and  duties of the Secretary of State re-
lating to business registry, and an amount necessary  to maintain a reasonable reserve, the
Secretary of State shall [ then] deposit all other moneys from the fees collected during the month
under ORS 56.140 (1) to (4)  in the General Fund. Amounts deposited to the General Fund under this
subsection are available for general governmental expenses.
Enrolled Senate Bill 25 (SB 25-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 3, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 25 (SB 25-A) Page 2